Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 201 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, "status verification system" means
an electronic system operated by the federal government, through
which an authorized official of an agency of the State of Oklahoma
or of a political subdivision therein may make an inquiry, by
exercise of authority delegated pursuant to Section 1373 of Title 8
of the United States Code, to verify or ascertain the citizenship or
immigration status of any individual within the jurisdiction of the
agency for any purpose authorized by subsection B of this section.
The status verification system shall be deemed to include:
Req. No. 12210 Page 1

1. The E-Verify Program of the Illegal Immigration Reform and
Immigration Responsibility Act of 1996, P.L. 104-208, Division C,
Section 403(a), 8 U.S.C., Section 1324a, and operated by the United
States Department of Homeland Security, known as the E-Verify
Program;
2. Any equivalent federal program designated by the United
States Department of Homeland Security or any other federal agency
authorized to verify the work eligibility status of newly hired
employees, pursuant to the Immigration Reform and Control Act of
1986 (IRCA), D.L. 99-603;
3. Any other independent, third-party system with an equal or
higher degree of reliability as the programs, systems, or processes
described in this subsection; or
4. The Social Security Number Verification Service, or such
similar online verification process implemented by the United States
Social Security Administration.
B. Beginning November 1, 2025, every employer registered to do
business in the State of Oklahoma must utilize a status verification
system for new hires.
C. Any employer or officer or agent of an employer who violates
this section shall receive three warnings. After the final warning,
a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than
Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each offense shall be incurred.

Req. No. 12210 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12210 TKR 01/16/25





















Req. No. 12210 Page 3